Hawaii statutes.
§281-53 Application; penalty for false
statements. Every application for a license or for the renewal of a
license or for the transfer of a license shall be in writing, signed and,
except for the renewal of a license, verified by the oath of the applicant, or
in the case of a corporation or unincorporated association by the proper
officer or officers thereof, or if a partnership by a general partner thereof,
or if a limited liability partnership by a partner thereof, or if a limited
liability company by a member thereof, made before any official authorized by
law to administer oaths, and shall be addressed to the liquor commission, and
set forth:

(1) The full name, age, and place of residence of the
applicant; if a copartnership, the names, ages, and respective places of
residence of all the partners; if a limited liability company, its full name
and the names of all its members; if a corporation or joint-stock company, its
full name and the names of its officers and directors, and the names of all
stockholders owning twenty-five per cent or more of the outstanding capital
stock; and if any other association of individuals, the names, ages, and
respective places of residence of its officers and the number of its members;

(2) A particular description of the place or premises
where the proposed license is to be exercised, so that the exact location and
extent thereof may be clearly and definitely determined therefrom;

(3) The class and kind of license applied for; and

(4) Any other matter or information pertinent to the
subject matter which may be required by the rules of the commission.

If any false statement is knowingly made in any
application which is verified by oath, the applicant, and in the case of the
application being made by a corporation, limited liability company,
association, or club, the persons signing the application, shall be guilty of
perjury, and shall be subject to the penalties prescribed by law for such
offense. If any false statement is knowingly made in any application which is
not verified by oath, the person or persons signing the application shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished as in
section 281-102 provided. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §29; RL 1935, §2598; am L 1937, c
211, §14; RL 1945, §7250; RL 1955, §159-52; am L 1957, c 321, §1(f); am L 1959,
c 100, §1; am L 1967, c 167, §1; HRS §281-53; am L 1972, c 177, §5; am L 1990,
c 171, §15; am L 1998, c 90, §4; am L 2008, c 168, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next